Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.180

Penalties. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

It shall be a gross misdemeanor and unlicensed practice for any person to:

(1) Use in connection with his or her name any designation tending to imply that he or she is a licensed psychologist unless duly licensed under or specifically excluded from the provisions of this chapter;

(2) Practice as a licensed psychologist during the time his or her license issued under the provisions of this chapter is suspended or revoked.

[ 1987 c 150 s 55; 1965 c 70 s 18; 1955 c 305 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

PDFRCW 18.83.180

Penalties. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

It shall be a gross misdemeanor and unlicensed practice for any person to:

(1) Use in connection with his or her name any designation tending to imply that he or she is a licensed psychologist or licensed psychological associate unless duly licensed under or specifically excluded from the provisions of this chapter;

(2) Practice as a licensed psychologist or licensed psychological associate during the time his or her license issued under the provisions of this chapter is suspended or revoked.

[ 2024 c 371 s 10; 1987 c 150 s 55; 1965 c 70 s 18; 1955 c 305 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.